Idaho, session 2026, S1377.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 60, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
60-106B. PUBLICATION OF NOTICES -- ABBREVIATED NOTICES ALLOWED. (1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any county,
city, or school district board of trustees required or provided by the laws
of the state of Idaho to publish legal notices, advertisements, or publica-
tions of any kind in a newspaper of general circulation in accordance with
section 60-106, Idaho Code, may elect to have an abbreviated version of such
notice published in accordance with the provisions of this section. The
abbreviated public notice shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name of the governmental entity issuing the public notice;
(b) A title and description of the contents of the public notice suffi-
cient to inform the public of such contents;
(c) The date, time, and location of any meeting, hearing, or action, if
applicable; and
(d) Either an internet link to the website address where the full public
notice can be found or a quick response code that links to the website
address where the full public notice can be found, or both.
(2) If all requirements of subsection (1) of this section are met, an
abbreviated public notice published pursuant to this section shall have the
same legal force and effect as full public notices published in a newspaper
pursuant to section 60-106, Idaho Code.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents a county, city, or school district
board of trustees from electing to publish a full public notice in a newspa-
per of general circulation.
(4) Whether a county, city, or school district board of trustees elects
to publish an abbreviated public notice or a full public notice in a newspa-
per of general circulation, such entity shall send to the newspaper a copy of
the full, unabbreviated public notice to be electronically published on the
public notices website of the newspaper association of Idaho.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
September 1, 2026.